Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4607
Presumption of unlimited authority.

Subject to section 30-4609, and unless the terms of the instrument creating a power of appointment manifest a contrary intent, the power is:

(1) presently exercisable;

(2) exclusionary; and

(3) except as otherwise provided in section 30-4609, general.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 30.